District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

38-2021.24

Rollovers; purchase of service credit.

Recodified as § 38-2021.26.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-2021.08 and § 38-2021.09.

Editor's Notes

Section 2(m) of D.C. Law 19-312 recodified former § 38-2021.24 as § 38-2021.26.